Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4035.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-879.5 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 17377 Page 1

A. Subject to availability of funding, there is hereby created
within the State Department of Health the Office of Alzheimer's
Disease and Related Dementia Service Coordination for the purpose of
providing statewide coordination, service system development, and
information on education, support, and other available services for
individuals with Alzheimer's disease or related dementias and their
caregivers.
B. The Office of Alzheimer's Disease and Related Dementia
Service Coordination shall have the power and duty to:
1. Evaluate the coordination of dementia services within this
state and identify any duplicated services;
2. Coordinate informational resources affecting individuals
with Alzheimer's disease or related dementias and their caregivers.
Such coordination shall include, but not be limited to:
a. using dementia-related data to coordinate strategies
designed to improve public health outcomes and service
delivery for individuals with Alzheimer's disease or
related dementias and their caregivers,
b. establishing and maintaining relationships with other
state agencies, providers, organizations, and
community stakeholders to meet the needs of affected
populations and prevent the duplication of services,


Req. No. 17377 Page 2

c. supporting the provision of dementia-specific staff
training across all relevant state agencies and
organizations, and
d. recommending strategies to improve coordination of
dementia-related services and resources provided by
public and private entities;
3. Streamline all applicable state government services to
increase efficiency and improve the quality of dementia-related care
in residential, home-based, and community-based settings;
4. Identify grant opportunities to expand the scope of services
for individuals with Alzheimer's disease or related dementias and
their caregivers and apply for such grant opportunities;
5. Perform other duties relevant to supporting policy
development and implementation to enhance the quality of life for
individuals with Alzheimer's disease or related dementias and their
caregivers;
6. Promote public and professional awareness and education
related to Alzheimer's disease and related dementias and access to
needed services and programs; and
7. Collect and monitor data concerning the impact of
Alzheimer's disease and related dementias in this state.
C. Subject to availability of funding, the Office of
Alzheimer's Disease and Related Dementia Service Coordination shall
maintain on staff at least one dementia services coordinator. The
Req. No. 17377 Page 3

deme ntia services coordinator shall be a full-time, permanent
employee and shall be responsible for the staffing and operational
details of the Office.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-879.6 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the State Department of Health to be designated the "Alzheimer's
Disease and Related Dementia Service Coordination Revolving Fund".
The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year
limitations, and shall consist of all monies received by the
Department from grants, gifts, and donations provided for the
purpose of funding the Office of Alzheimer's Disease and Related
Dementia Service Coordination created under Section 1 of this act.
All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby
appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Department for
the purpose provided for in this section. Expenditures from the
fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer
against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
payment.
SECTION 3. REPEALER 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-879.2 and 1-
879.3, is hereby repealed.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
Req. No. 17377 Page 4

SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-17377 MKS 04/10/26


















Req. No. 17377 Page 5